District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “District Employee Paid Parental, Family, and Medical Leave
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of
1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C. Official Code § 1-601.01 et seq.), is
amended as follows:
(a) Section 1204 (D.C. Official Code § 1-612.04) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (4) is amended to read as follows:
“(4)(A) “Eligible employee” means a District government employee, including an
employee of an independent agency; provided, that for the purposes of using paid family leave or


paid medical leave, the term “eligible employee” means a District government employee,
including an employee of an independent agency, has worked for the District government for at
least 180 days, without a break in service, as of the date on which the paid family leave or paid
medical leave will be used.
“(B) The term “eligible employee” does not include:
“(i) A temporary employee appointed for less than 90 days; or
“(ii) An employee with intermittent employment.”.
(2) Paragraph (5) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the semicolon at the end and
inserting the phrase “; or” in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (C) is amended to read as follows:
“(C) A spouse or domestic partner.”.
(C) Subparagraphs (D) and (E) are repealed.
(b) Section 1204a (D.C. Official Code § 1-612.04a) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a)(1)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “8 workweeks” and
inserting the phrase “2 workweeks” in its place.
(2) A new subsection (c-1) is added to read as follows:
“(c-1)(1) To the extent practicable, an eligible employee shall, before using paid leave,
provide written notice to their personnel authority or agency of the need for the use of paid leave
and of the expected date or dates on which the employee intends to use paid leave.
“(2) If the employee plans to use paid leave on an intermittent basis, the written
notice shall, to the extent practicable, include a schedule of the expected hours during which the
employee intends to use paid leave.


“(3) The written notice shall include a reason for the use of paid leave, within the
parameters of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, approved August
21, 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-191; 110 Stat. 1936).
“(4) If the use of paid leave is foreseeable, the written notice shall be provided at
least 10 days, or as early as possible, in advance of the use of the paid leave.
“(5) If the use of paid leave is unforeseeable, a notification, either oral or written,
shall be provided before the start of the work shift for which the paid leave is being used.
“(6) In the case of an emergency resulting in the use of paid leave without the
opportunity to provide prior notification, the eligible employee, or another individual on behalf
of the eligible employee, shall notify the Mayor, either orally or in writing, within 48 hours after
the emergency occurs.
“(7) If the agency determines that the use of paid leave is likely to interfere with
the operations of the agency, the agency and eligible employee shall engage in good-faith
negotiations on alternate dates or hours for the use of the paid leave. The agency may deny the
use of paid leave under this section if an employee does not agree to a reasonable request to
revise the dates or hours for the use of the paid leave.”.
(3) Subsection (d)(2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) If a probationary employee voluntarily separates in violation of the 1-year
continuation of service agreement, the individual shall be indebted to the District government for
the salary paid during the leave period. Indebtedness incurred pursuant to this paragraph may be
treated in whole or in part as an erroneous payment pursuant to section 2901 of the District of
Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C.
Official Code § 1-629.01 et. seq.).
(4) A new subsection (d-1) is added to read as follows:


“(d-1)(1) An employee, other than an employee serving in a probationary capacity, using
paid parental, family, or medical leave shall be required to enter into a continuation of service
agreement. The continuation of service agreement shall require the employee to continue to
serve as a District employee for 12 weeks after the use of the paid parental, family, or medical
leave.
“(2) If the employee voluntarily separates in violation of the continuation of
service agreement, the individual shall be indebted to the District government for the salary paid
during the leave period. Indebtedness incurred pursuant to this paragraph may be treated in
whole or in part as an erroneous payment pursuant to section 2901 of the District of Columbia
Government Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C. Official Code
§ 1-629.01 et. seq.).
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
100 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
101 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
102 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
103 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).